Utah statutes.
73-18c-306.   Certificate of self-funded coverage as proof of owner's or operator's security.

(1)  The division may, upon the application of any person, issue a certificate of self-funded coverage when it is satisfied that the person has:

(a)  more than 24 motorboats; and

(b)  on deposit, in a form approved by the division, cash or securities in an amount of $200,000 plus $100 for each motorboat up to and including 1,000 motorboats and $50 for each motorboat over 1,000 motorboats.

(2)  Persons holding a certificate of self-funded coverage under this chapter shall pay benefits to persons injured from the self-funded person's operation, maintenance, and use of motorboats as would an insurer issuing a policy to the self-funded person containing the coverages under Sections 31A-22-1502 and 31A-22-1503.

(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the division may, upon reasonable grounds, cancel the certificate.  Failure to pay any judgment up to the limit under Subsection 31A-22-1503(2) within 30 days after the judgment is final is a reasonable ground to cancel the certificate.

(4)  Any government entity with self-funded coverage for government-owned motorboats under Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah, meets the requirements of this section.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

